Tennessee, session 114, SB0565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-1304(e), is amended by adding
the following language at the end of the subsection:
Each LEA and public charter school must review any new curricula recommended by the
joint task force prior to the start of each school year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0565
001333
- 1 -